Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5886.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3101. (1) Except as provided in sections 3107d and 3109a, allowed under this chapter, the owner or registrant of a motor vehicle required to be registered in this state shall maintain security for payment of benefits under personal protection insurance and property protection insurance, as required under this chapter, and residual liability insurance, as required under section 3009. Security is only required to be in effect during the period the motor vehicle is driven or moved on a highway. (2) Except as provided in section 3107d, under this chapter, all automobile insurance policies offered in this state must include benefits under personal protection insurance , and property protection insurance, as provided in this chapter, and under residual liability insurance, as provided in section 3009. Notwithstanding any other provision in this act, an insurer that has issued an automobile insurance policy may only delete portions of the coverages under the policy and maintain the comprehensive coverage portion on a motor vehicle that is not driven or moved on a highway in accordance with section 3009(4). (3) As used in this chapter: (a) "Automobile insurance" means that term as defined in section 2102. (b) "Commercial quadricycle" means a vehicle to which all of the following apply: (i) The vehicle has fully operative pedals for propulsion entirely by human power. (ii) The vehicle has at least 4 wheels and is operated in a manner similar to a bicycle. (iii) The vehicle has at least 6 seats for passengers. (iv) The vehicle is designed to be occupied by a driver and powered either by passengers providing pedal power to the drive train of the vehicle or by a motor capable of propelling the vehicle in the absence of human power. (v) The vehicle is used for commercial purposes. (vi) The vehicle is operated by the owner of the vehicle or an employee of the owner of the vehicle. (c) "Electric bicycle" means that term as defined in section 13e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.13e. (d) "Golf cart" means a vehicle designed for transportation while playing the game of golf. (e) "Highway" means highway or street as that term is defined in section 20 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.20. (f) "Moped" means that term as defined in section 32b of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.32b. (g) "Motorcycle" means a vehicle that has a saddle or seat for the use of the rider, is designed to travel on not more than 3 wheels in contact with the ground, and is equipped with a motor that exceeds 50 cubic centimeters piston displacement. For purposes of this subdivision, the wheels on any attachment to the vehicle are not considered as wheels in contact with the ground. Motorcycle does not include a moped or an ORV. (h) "Motorcycle accident" means a loss that involves the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motorcycle as a motorcycle, but does not involve the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as a motor vehicle. (i) "Motor vehicle" means a vehicle, including a trailer, that is operated or designed for operation on a public highway by power other than muscular power and has more than 2 wheels. Motor vehicle does not include any of the following: (i) A motorcycle. (ii) A moped. (iii) A farm tractor or other implement of husbandry that is not subject to the registration requirements of the Michigan vehicle code under section 216 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.216. (iv) An ORV. (v) A golf cart. (vi) A power-driven mobility device. (vii) A commercial quadricycle. (viii) An electric bicycle. (j) "Motor vehicle accident" means a loss that involves the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as a motor vehicle regardless of whether the accident also involves the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motorcycle as a motorcycle. (k) "ORV" means a motor-driven recreation vehicle designed for off-road use and capable of cross-country travel without benefit of road or trail, on or immediately over land, snow, ice, marsh, swampland, or other natural terrain. ORV includes, but is not limited to, a multitrack or multiwheel drive vehicle, a motorcycle or related 2-wheel, 3-wheel, or 4-wheel vehicle, an amphibious machine, a ground effect air cushion vehicle, an ATV as defined in section 81101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81101, or other means of transportation deriving motive power from a source other than muscle or wind. ORV does not include a vehicle described in this subdivision that is registered for use on a public highway and has the security required under subsection (1) this section or section 3103 in effect. (l) "Owner" means any of the following: (i) A person renting a motor vehicle or having the use of a motor vehicle, under a lease or otherwise, for a period that is greater than 30 days. (ii) A person renting a motorcycle or having the use of a motorcycle under a lease for a period that is greater than 30 days, or otherwise for a period that is greater than 30 consecutive days. A person who borrows a motorcycle for a period that is less than 30 consecutive days with the consent of the owner is not an owner under this subparagraph. (iii) A person that holds the legal title to a motor vehicle or motorcycle, other than a person engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles or motorcycles that is the lessor of a motor vehicle or motorcycle under a lease that provides for the use of the motor vehicle or motorcycle by the lessee for a period that is greater than 30 days. (iv) A person that has the immediate right of possession of a motor vehicle or motorcycle under an installment sale contract. (m) "Power-driven mobility device" means a wheelchair or other mobility device powered by a battery, fuel, or other engine and designed to be used by an individual with a mobility disability for the purpose of locomotion. (n) "Registrant" does not include a person engaged in the business of leasing motor vehicles or motorcycles that is the lessor of a motor vehicle or motorcycle under a lease that provides for the use of the motor vehicle or motorcycle by the lessee for a period that is longer than 30 days. (4) Security required by subsection (1) this section may be provided under a policy issued by an authorized insurer that affords insurance for the payment of benefits described in subsection (1). A policy of insurance represented or sold as providing security is considered to provide insurance for the payment of the benefits. (5) Security required by subsection (1) this section may be provided by any other method approved by the secretary of state as affording security equivalent to that afforded by a policy of insurance, if proof of the security is filed and continuously maintained with the secretary of state throughout the period the motor vehicle is driven or moved on a highway. The person filing the security has all the obligations and rights of an insurer under this chapter. When the context permits, "insurer" as used in this chapter, includes a person that files the security as provided in this section. (6) An insurer that issues a policy that provides the security required under subsection (1) this section may exclude coverage under the policy as provided in section 3017 or 3018. Sec. 3104. (1) The catastrophic claims association is created as an unincorporated, nonprofit association. Each insurer engaged in writing insurance coverages that provide the security required by section 3101(1) in this state, 3101, as a condition of its authority to transact insurance in this state, shall be a member of the association and is bound by the plan of operation of the association. An insurer engaged in writing insurance coverages that provide the security required by section 3103(1) in this state, as a condition of its authority to transact insurance in this state, is considered to be a member of the association, but only for purposes of premiums under subsection (7)(d). Except as expressly provided in this section, the association is not subject to any laws of this state with respect to insurers, but in all other respects the association is subject to the laws of this state to the extent that the association would be if it were an insurer organized and subsisting under chapter 50. (2) For all motor vehicle accident policies issued or renewed before July 2, 2020 and for a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed after July 1, 2020 to for which the coverage level selected under section 3107c(1)(d) applies, 3107c is more than the amount applicable under this subsection for the policy, the association shall provide and each member shall accept indemnification for 100% of the amount of ultimate loss sustained under personal protection insurance coverages in excess of the following amounts in each loss occurrence: (a) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2002, $250,000.00. (b) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2002 to June 30, 2003, $300,000.00. (c) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2003 to June 30, 2004, $325,000.00. (d) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2004 to June 30, 2005, $350,000.00. (e) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2005 to June 30, 2006, $375,000.00. (f) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2006 to June 30, 2007, $400,000.00. (g) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2007 to June 30, 2008, $420,000.00. (h) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2008 to June 30, 2009, $440,000.00. (i) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2009 to June 30, 2010, $460,000.00. (j) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2010 to June 30, 2011, $480,000.00. (k) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2011 to June 30, 2013, $500,000.00. (l) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2013 to June 30, 2015, $530,000.00. (m) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2015 to June 30, 2017, $545,000.00. (n) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2017 to June 30, 2019, $555,000.00. (o) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2019 to June 30, 2021, $580,000.00. (p) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2021 to June 30, 2023, $600,000.00. (q) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period July 1, 2023 to June 30, 2025, $635,000.00. (r) For a motor vehicle accident policy issued or renewed during the period beginning July 1, 2025 to June 30, 2027, $675,000.00. Beginning July 1, 2021, 2027, this $580,000.00 $675,000.00 amount must be increased biennially on July 1 of each odd-numbered year, for policies issued or renewed before July 1 of the following odd-numbered year, by the lesser of 6% or the Consumer Price Index, and rounded to the nearest $5,000.00. The association shall calculate this biennial adjustment by January 1 of the year of its July 1 effective date. (3) An insurer may withdraw from the association only on ceasing to write insurance that provides the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 in this state. (4) An insurer whose membership in the association has been terminated by withdrawal continues to be bound by the plan of operation, and on withdrawal, all unpaid premiums that have been charged to the withdrawing member are payable as of the effective date of the withdrawal. (5) An unsatisfied net liability to the association of an insolvent member must be assumed by and apportioned among the remaining members of the association as provided in the plan of operation. The association has all rights allowed by law on behalf of the remaining members against the estate or funds of the insolvent member for money due the association. (6) If a member has been merged or consolidated into another insurer or another insurer has reinsured a member's entire business that provides the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 in this state, the member and successors in interest of the member remain liable for the member's obligations. (7) The association shall do all of the following on behalf of the members of the association: (a) Assume 100% of all liability as provided in subsection (2). (b) Establish procedures by which members must promptly report to the association each claim that, on the basis of the injuries or damages sustained, may reasonably be anticipated to involve the association if the member is ultimately held legally liable for the injuries or damages. Solely for the purpose of reporting claims, the member shall in all instances consider itself legally liable for the injuries or damages. The member shall also advise the association of subsequent developments likely to materially affect the interest of the association in the claim. (c) Maintain relevant loss and expense data relating to all liabilities of the association and require each member to furnish statistics, in connection with liabilities of the association, at the times and in the form and detail as required by the plan of operation. (d) In a manner provided for in the plan of operation, calculate and charge to members of the association a total premium sufficient to cover the expected losses and expenses of the association that the association will likely incur during the period for which the premium is applicable. The total premium must include an amount to cover incurred but not reported losses for the period and must be adjusted for any excess or deficient premiums from previous periods. Excesses or deficiencies from previous periods must either be fully adjusted in a single period or be adjusted over several periods in a manner provided for in the plan of operation. Each member must be charged an amount equal to that member's total written car years of insurance providing the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 or 3103(1), or both, written in this state during the period to which the premium applies, with the total written car years of insurance multiplied by the applicable average premium per car. The average premium per car is the total premium, as adjusted for any excesses or deficiencies, divided by the total written car years of insurance providing the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 or 3103(1), or both, written in this state of all members during the period to which the premium applies, excluding cars insured under a policy with a selected coverage limit under section 3107c(1)(a), (b), or (c), cars as to which an election to not maintain 3107c that is not more than the amount applicable under subsection (2) for the policy or under a policy that does not provide personal protection insurance benefits has been made under section 3107d, or as to which an exclusion under section 3109a(2) applies, as allowed under this chapter, except for any portion of total premium that is an adjustment for a deficiency in a previous period. A member may not be charged a premium for a car insured under a policy with a selected coverage limit under section 3107c(1)(a), (b), or (c), as to which an election to not maintain 3107c that is not more than the amount applicable under subsection (2) for the policy or under a policy that does not provide personal protection insurance benefits has been made under section 3107d, or as to which an exclusion under section 3109a(2) applies, as allowed under this chapter, other than for the portion of the total premium attributable to an adjustment for a deficiency in a previous period. A member must be charged a premium for a historic vehicle that is insured with the member of 20% of the premium charged for a car insured with the member. (e) Require and accept the payment of premiums from members of the association as provided for in the plan of operation. The association shall do either of the following: (i) Require payment of the premium in full within not later than 45 days after the premium charge. (ii) Require payment of the premiums to be made periodically to cover the actual cash obligations of the association. (f) Receive and distribute all money required by the operation of the association. (g) Establish procedures for reviewing claims procedures and practices of members of the association. If the claims procedures or practices of a member are considered inadequate to properly service the liabilities of the association, the association may undertake or may contract with another person, including another member, to adjust or assist in the adjustment of claims for the member on claims that create a potential liability to the association and may charge the cost of the adjustment to the member. (h) Provide any records necessary or requested by the director for the actuarial examination under subsection (21). (i) Subject to subsection (23), obey an order of the director for a refund under subsection (22). (8) In addition to other powers granted to it by this section, the association may do all of the following: (a) Sue and be sued in the name of the association. A judgment against the association does not create any direct liability against the individual members of the association. The association may provide for the indemnification of its members, members of the board of directors of the association, and officers, employees, and other persons lawfully acting on behalf of the association. (b) Reinsure all or any portion of its potential liability with reinsurers licensed to transact insurance in this state or approved by the director. (c) Provide for appropriate housing, equipment, and personnel as necessary to assure the efficient operation of the association. (d) Pursuant to In accordance with the plan of operation, adopt reasonable rules for the administration of the association, enforce those rules, and delegate authority, as the board considers necessary to assure the proper administration and operation of the association consistent consistently with the plan of operation. (e) Contract for goods and services, including independent claims management, actuarial, investment, and legal services, from others in or outside of this state to assure the efficient operation of the association. (f) Hear and determine complaints of a company or other interested party concerning the operation of the association. (g) Perform other acts not specifically enumerated in this section that are necessary or proper to accomplish the purposes of the association and that are not inconsistent with this section or the plan of operation. (9) A board of directors is created and shall operate the association consistent consistently with the plan of operation and this section. (10) The plan of operation must provide for all of the following: (a) The establishment of necessary facilities. (b) The management and operation of the association. (c) Procedures to be utilized used in charging premiums, including adjustments from excess or deficient premiums from prior periods. The plan must require that any deficiency from a prior period be amortized over not fewer than 15 years. (d) Procedures for a refund to members of the association, for distribution to insureds as provided in subsection (24), as ordered by the director under subsection (22). The procedures must provide for a distribution of a refund attributable to a historic vehicle equal to 20% of the refund for a car that is not a historic vehicle. (e) Procedures governing the actual payment of premiums to the association. (f) Reimbursement of each member of the board by the association for actual and necessary expenses incurred on association business. (g) The investment policy of the association. (h) Any other matters required by or necessary to effectively implement this section. (11) The board must include members that would contribute a total of not less than 40% of the total premium calculated under subsection (7)(d). Each board member is entitled to 1 vote. The initial term of office of a board member is 2 years. (12) As part of the plan of operation, the board shall adopt rules providing for the composition of the board and the terms of board members, consistent with the membership composition requirements in subsections (11) and (13). Terms of the board members must be staggered so that the terms of all the board members do not expire at the same time and so that a board member does not serve a term of more than 4 years. (13) The board must consist of 5 board members and the director, who shall serve as an ex officio member of the board without vote. (14) The director shall appoint the board members. A board member shall serve until his or her the member's successor is selected and qualified. The board shall elect the chairperson of the board. The director shall fill any vacancy on the board as provided in the plan of operation. (15) The board shall meet as often as the chairperson, the director, or the plan of operation requires, or at the request of any 3 board members. The chairperson may vote on all issues. Four board members constitute a quorum. (16) The board shall furnish to each member of the association an annual report of the operations of the association in a form and detail as determined by the board. (17) Any amendments to the plan of operation are subject to majority approval by the board, ratification by a majority of the membership of the association having a vote, with voting rights being apportioned according to the premiums charged in subsection (7)(d), and approval by the director. (18) An insurer authorized to write insurance providing the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 in this state, as provided in this section, is bound by and shall formally subscribe to and participate in the plan of operation as a condition of maintaining its authority to transact insurance in this state. (19) The association is subject to all the reporting, loss reserve, and investment requirements of the director to the same extent as is a member of the association. (20) Premiums charged members by the association must be recognized in the rate-making procedures for insurance rates in the same manner that expenses and premium taxes are recognized. If a member of the association passes on any portion of the premium payable under this section to an insured, the amount passed on must equal the portion of the premium payable by the member under this section attributable to the car or historic vehicle insured, including any adjustments for excesses or deficiencies from a previous period. (21) The director or an authorized representative of the director may visit the association at any time and examine any and all of the association's affairs. Beginning July 1, 2022, and every third year after 2022, the director shall engage 1 or more independent actuaries to examine the affairs and records of the association for the previous 3 years. The actuarial examination must be conducted using sound actuarial principles consistent with the applicable statements of principles and the code of professional conduct adopted by the Casualty Actuarial Society. By September 1, 2022 and by September 1 of every third year after 2022, the director shall provide a report to the legislature on the results of the audit conducted under this subsection. (22) If the actuarial examination under subsection (21) shows that the assets of the association exceed 120% of its liabilities, including incurred but not reported liabilities, and if the refund will not threaten the association's ongoing ability to provide reimbursements for personal protection insurance benefits based on sound actuarial principles consistent with the applicable statements of principles and the code of professional conduct adopted by the Casualty Actuarial Society, the director shall order the association to refund an amount equal to the difference between the total excess and 120% of the liabilities of the association, including incurred but not reported liabilities, under subsection (10)(d) and order the members of the association to distribute the refunds under subsection (24). (23) Within Not later than 30 days after receiving an order from the director under subsection (22), the association may request a hearing to review the order by filing a written request with the director. The department shall conduct the review as a contested case under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (24) A member of the association shall distribute any refund it receives under subsection (10)(d) to the persons that it insures under policies that provide the security required under section 3101(1) 3101 or 3103(1), or both, and that are subject to a premium under this section on a uniform basis per car and historic vehicle in a manner and on the date or dates provided by the director in accordance with an order issued by the director. A refund attributable to a historic vehicle must be equal to 20% of the refund for a car that is not a historic vehicle. (25) By September 1 of each year, the association shall prepare, submit to the committees of the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over insurance matters, and post on the association website an annual consumer statement, written in a manner intended for the general public. The statement must include all of the following: (a) The number of claims opened during the preceding 12 months, the amount expended on the claims, and the future anticipated costs of the claims. (b) For each of the preceding 10 years, the total number of open claims, the amount expended on the claims, and the anticipated future costs of the claims. (c) For each of the preceding 10 years, the total number of claims closed and the amount expended on the claims. (d) For each of the preceding 10 years, the ratio of claims opened to claims closed. (e) For each of the preceding 10 years, the average length of open claims. (f) A statement of the current financial condition of the association and the reasons for any deficit or surplus in collected assessments compared to losses. (g) A statement of the assumptions, methodology, and data used to make revenue projections. As used in this subdivision, "revenue" means return on investments. (h) A statement of the assumptions, methodology, and data used to make cost projections. (i) A list of the association's assets, sorted by category or type of asset, such as stocks, bonds, or mutual funds, and the expected return on each asset. (j) The total amount of the association's discounted and undiscounted liabilities and a description and explanation of the liabilities, including an explanation of the association's definition of the terms discounted and undiscounted. (k) Measures taken by the association to contain costs. (l) A statement explaining what portion of the assessment to insureds as recognized in rates under subsection (20) is attributable to claims occurring in the previous 12 months, administrative costs, and the amount, if any, to adjust for past deficits. (m) A statement explaining any qualifications identified by the independent auditors in the most recent audit report prepared under subsection (21). (n) A loss payment summary for each of the preceding years by category. (o) For each of the preceding 10 years, an injury type summary, categorizing the injuries suffered by claimants the payment of whose claims are being reimbursed by the association, by brain injuries, injuries resulting in quadriplegia, injuries resulting in paraplegia, burn injuries, and other injuries. (p) A summary of investment returns over the preceding 10 years showing the investment balance, the investment gain, and the percentage return on the investment balance. (q) A summary of the mortality assumptions used in making cost projections. (r) A summary of any financial practices that differ from those found in the National Association of Insurance Commissioners Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual. (26) By September 1 of each year, the association shall prepare and provide to the committees of the senate and house of representatives with jurisdiction over insurance matters an annual report of the association. The report must contain all of the following: (a) An executive summary. (b) A discussion of the mortality assumptions used by the association in making cost projections. (c) An evaluation of the accuracy of the association's actuarial assumptions over the preceding 5 years. (d) The annual consumer statement prepared under subsection (25). (e) Anything else the association determines is necessary to advise the legislature about the operations of the association. (27) The association does not have liability for losses occurring before July 1, 1978. After July 1, 2020, the association does not have liability for an ultimate loss under personal protection insurance coverage for a motor vehicle accident policy to which a limit selected under section 3107c(1)(a), (b), or (c) is applicable.3107c is not more than the amount applicable under subsection (2) for the policy. (28) As used in this section: (a) "Association" means the catastrophic claims association created in subsection (1). (b) "Board" means the board of directors of the association created in subsection (9). (c) "Car" includes a motorcycle but does not include a historic vehicle. (d) "Consumer Price Index" means the percentage of change in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers in the United States city average for all items for the 24 months before October 1 of the year before the July 1 effective date of the biennial adjustment under subsection (2)(o) (2)(r) as reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, and as certified by the director. (e) "Historic vehicle" means a vehicle that is a registered historic vehicle under section 803a or 803p of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.803a and 257.803p. (f) "Motor vehicle accident policy" means a policy providing the coverages required under section 3101(1)3101. (g) "Ultimate loss" means the actual loss amounts that a member is obligated to pay and that are paid or payable by the member, and do not include claim expenses. An ultimate loss is incurred by the association on the date that the loss occurs. Sec. 3107c. (1) Except as provided in sections 3107d and 3109a for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, and subject to subsection section 3015 and subsections (2) and (5), for an insurance policy that provides the security required under section 3101(1) and is issued or renewed after July 1, 2020, 3101, the applicant or named insured shall, in a way required under section 3107e and on a form approved by the director, select 1 of the following coverage levels for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a): (a) A limit of $50,000.00 per individual per loss occurrence for any personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a). The For a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, the selection of a limit under this subdivision is only available to an applicant or named insured if both of the following apply: (i) The applicant or named insured is enrolled in Medicaid, as that term is defined in section 3157. (ii) The applicant's or named insured's spouse and any relative of either who resides in the same household has qualified health coverage, as that term is defined in section 3107d, is enrolled in Medicaid, or has coverage for the payment of benefits under section 3107(1)(a) from an insurer that provides the security required by section 3101(1).3101. (b) A limit of $250,000.00 per individual per loss occurrence for any personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a). (c) A limit of $500,000.00 per individual per loss occurrence for any personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a). (d) No limit for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a). (e) No coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a). The option under this subdivision only applies for a policy issued or renewed after June 30, 2027. (2) In addition to the levels of coverage that are required to be offered under subsection (1), an insurer that issues or renews an insurance policy that provides the security required under section 3101 after June 30, 2027 may offer additional levels of coverage for personal protection benefits under section 3107(1)(a). An applicant or named insured may select 1 of the additional levels of coverage offered in the same manner and with the same effect as the selection of 1 of the levels required to be offered under subsection (1). (3) (2) The form by which a selection is made as required under subsection (1) this section must do all of the following: (a) State, in a conspicuous manner, the benefits and risks associated with each coverage option. (b) For a policy issued or renewed after June 30, 2027, state, in a conspicuous manner, that a selection will remain in effect while the insured remains insured with the same insurer or an affiliate of the insurer, as that term is defined in section 2102, unless the insured selects a different coverage option. (c) (b) Provide For an initial selection under this section, provide a way for the applicant or named insured to mark the form to acknowledge that he or she the applicant has read the form and understands the options available. (d) (c) Allow For an initial selection under this section, allow the applicant or named insured to mark the form to make the selection of coverage level under subsection (1) or (2). (e) (d) Require For an initial selection under this section, require the applicant or named insured to sign the form. (4) (3) If an insurance policy is issued or renewed as described in subsection (1) and the applicant or named insured has not made an effective selection under subsection (1) or (2) but a premium or premium installment has been paid, there is a rebuttable presumption that the amount of the premium or installment paid accurately reflects the level of coverage applicable to the policy under subsection (1) or (2). (5) (4) If an insurance policy is issued or renewed as described in subsection (1), the applicant or named insured has not made an effective selection under subsection (1) or (2), and a presumption under subsection (3) (4) does not apply, subsection (1)(d) applies to the policy. (6) (5) The coverage level selected under subsection (1) or (2) applies to the named insured, the named insured's spouse, and a relative of either domiciled in the same household, and any other person with a right to claim personal protection insurance benefits under the policy. (7) (6) If benefits are payable under section 3107(1)(a) under 2 or more insurance policies, the benefits are only payable up to an aggregate coverage limit that equals the highest available coverage limit under any 1 of the policies. (8) (7) This section applies for a transportation network company vehicle, but for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, an applicant or named insured that is a transportation network company shall only select limits under either subsection (1)(b), (c), or (d). As used in this subsection: (a) "Transportation network company" means that term as defined in section 2 of the limousine, taxicab, and transportation network company act, 2016 PA 345, MCL 257.2102. (b) "Transportation network company vehicle" means that term as defined in section 3114. (9) (8) An insurer shall offer, for a policy that provides the security required under section 3101(1) 3101 to which a limit under subsection (1)(a) to (c) or (2) applies, a rider that will provide coverage for attendant care in excess of the applicable limit. Sec. 3107d. (1) For an insurance policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027 that provides the security required under section 3101(1) and is issued or renewed after July 1, 2020, 3101, the applicant or named insured may, in a way required under section 3107e and on a form approved by the director, elect to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a) if the applicant or named insured is a qualified person, and if the applicant's or named insured's spouse and any relative of either that resides in the same household have qualified health coverage or have coverage for benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a) from an insurer that provides the security required by section 3101(1).3101. (2) An applicant or named insured shall, when requesting issuance or renewal of a policy under subsection (1), provide to the insurer a document from the person that provides the qualified health coverage stating the names of all persons covered under the qualified health coverage. (3) The form required under subsection (1) must do all of the following: (a) Require the applicant or named insured to mark the form to certify whether all persons required to be qualified persons under subsection (1) are qualified persons. (b) Disclose in a conspicuous manner that qualified persons are not obligated to but may purchase coverage for personal protection insurance coverage benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a). (c) State, in a conspicuous manner, the coverage levels available under section 3107c. (d) State, in a conspicuous manner, the benefits and risks associated with not maintaining the coverage. (e) State, in a conspicuous manner, that if during the term of the policy the qualified health coverage ceases, the person has 30 days after the effective date of the termination of qualified health coverage to obtain insurance that provides coverage under section 3107(1)(a) or the person will be excluded from all personal protection insurance coverage benefits under section 3107(1)(a) during the period in which coverage under this section was not maintained. (f) Provide a way for the applicant or named insured to mark the form to acknowledge that he or she the applicant or named insured has read the form and understands it and that he or she the applicant or named insured understands the options available. to him or her. (g) If all persons required to be qualified persons under subsection (1) are qualified persons, provide the person applicant or named insured a way to mark the form to elect to not maintain the coverage. (h) Require the applicant or named insured to sign the form. (4) If an insurance policy is issued or renewed as described in subsection (1) and the applicant or named insured has not made an effective election under subsection (1), the policy is considered to provide personal protection benefits under section 3107c(1)(d). (5) An election under this section applies to the applicant or named insured, the applicant or named insured's spouse, a relative of either domiciled in the same household, and any other person who would have had a right to claim personal protection insurance benefits under the policy but for the election. (6) If, during the term of an insurance policy under which coverage for personal protection insurance benefits payable under section 3107(1)(a) are not maintained under this section, the persons required to have qualified health coverage under subsection (1) cease to have qualified health coverage, all of the following apply under this subsection: (a) Within Not later than 30 days after the effective date of the termination of qualified health coverage, the named insured shall obtain insurance that includes coverage under section 3107(1)(a). (b) An insurer that issues policies that provide the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 shall not refuse to prospectively insure, limit coverage available to, charge a reinstatement fee to, or increase the insurance premiums for a person who is an eligible person, as that term is defined in section 2103, solely because the person previously failed to obtain insurance that provides coverage for benefits under section 3107(1)(a) in the time required under subdivision (a). (c) If the applicant or named insured does not obtain insurance as required under subdivision (a) and a person to whom the election under this section applies as described in subsection (5) suffers accidental bodily injury arising from a motor vehicle accident within the 30-day period, unless the injured person is entitled to coverage under some other policy, the injured person is not entitled to be paid personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a) for the injury but is entitled to claim benefits under the assigned claims plan. (7) As used in this section: (a) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for this state from the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics. (a) (b) "Qualified health coverage" means either of the following: (i) Other health or accident coverage to which both of the following apply: (A) The coverage does not exclude or limit coverage for injuries related to motor vehicle accidents. (B) Any annual deductible for the coverage is $6,000.00 $6,579.00 or less per individual. The director shall adjust the amount in this sub-subparagraph on July 1 of each year by the percentage change in the medical component of the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year. However, the director shall not make the adjustment unless the adjustment, or the total of the adjustment and previous unadded adjustments, is $500.00 or more. (ii) Coverage under parts A and B of the federal Medicare program established under subchapter XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395lll.1395w-6. (b) (c) "Qualified person" means a person who has qualified health coverage under subdivision (b)(ii).(a)(ii). Sec. 3114. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (5), a personal protection insurance policy described in section 3101(1) 3101 applies to accidental bodily injury to the person named in the policy, the person's spouse, and a relative of either domiciled in the same household, if the injury arises from a motor vehicle accident. A personal injury insurance policy described in section 3103(2) applies to accidental bodily injury to the person named in the policy, the person's spouse, and a relative of either domiciled in the same household, if the injury arises from a motorcycle accident. If personal protection insurance benefits or personal injury benefits described in section 3103(2) are payable to or for the benefit of an injured person under his or her the person's own policy and would also be payable under the policy of his or her the person's spouse, relative, or relative's spouse, the injured person's insurer shall pay all of the benefits up to the coverage level applicable under section 3107c to the injured person's policy, and is not entitled to recoupment from the other insurer. (2) A person who suffers accidental bodily injury while an operator or a passenger of a motor vehicle operated in the business of transporting passengers shall receive the personal protection insurance benefits to which the person is entitled from the insurer of the motor vehicle. This subsection does not apply to a passenger in any of the following, unless the passenger is not entitled to personal protection insurance benefits under any other policy: (a) A school bus, as defined by the department of education, providing transportation not prohibited by law. (b) A bus operated by a common carrier of passengers certified by the department of transportation. (c) A bus operating under a government sponsored transportation program. (d) A bus operated by or providing service to a nonprofit organization. (e) A taxicab insured as prescribed in section 3101 or 3102. (f) A bus operated by a canoe or other watercraft, bicycle, or horse livery used only to transport passengers to or from a destination point. (g) A transportation network company vehicle. (h) A motor vehicle insured under a policy issued after June 30, 2027 for which the person named in the policy has selected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107c(1) or, for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, for which the person named in the policy has elected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107d or as to which an exclusion under section 3109a(2) applies. (3) An employee, his or her the employee's spouse, or a relative of either domiciled in the same household, who suffers accidental bodily injury while an occupant of a motor vehicle owned or registered by the employer, shall receive personal protection insurance benefits to which the employee is entitled from the insurer of the furnished vehicle. (4) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3), a person who suffers accidental bodily injury arising from a motor vehicle accident while an occupant of a motor vehicle who is not covered under a personal protection insurance policy as provided in subsection (1) shall claim personal protection insurance benefits under the assigned claims plan under sections 3171 to 3175. This subsection does not apply to a person insured under a policy issued after June 30, 2027 for which the person named in the policy has selected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107c(1) or, for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, for which the person named in the policy has elected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107d or as to which an exclusion under section 3109(2) 3109a(2) applies, or who is not entitled to be paid personal protection benefits under section 3107d(6)(c) or 3109a(2)(d)(ii). (5) Subject to subsections (6) and (7), a person who suffers accidental bodily injury arising from a motor vehicle accident that shows evidence of the involvement of a motor vehicle while an operator or passenger of a motorcycle shall claim personal protection insurance benefits from insurers in the following order of priority: (a) The insurer of the owner or registrant of the motor vehicle involved in the accident. (b) The insurer of the operator of the motor vehicle involved in the accident. (c) The motor vehicle insurer of the operator of the motorcycle involved in the accident. (d) The motor vehicle insurer of the owner or registrant of the motorcycle involved in the accident. (6) If an applicable insurance policy in an order of priority under subsection (5) is a policy issued after June 30, 2027 for which the person named in the policy has selected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107c(1) or, for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, for which the person named in the policy has elected to not maintain coverage for personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107d , or as to which an exclusion under section 3109(2) 3109a(2) applies, the injured person shall claim benefits only under other policies, subject to subsection (7), in the same order of priority for which no such selection or election has been made. If there are no other policies for which no such selection or election has been made, the injured person shall claim benefits under the next order of priority or, if there is not a next order of priority, under the assigned claims plan under sections 3171 to 3175. (7) If personal protection insurance benefits are payable under subsection (5) under 2 or more insurance policies in the same order of priority, the benefits are only payable up to an aggregate coverage limit that equals the highest available coverage limit under any 1 of the policies. (8) Subject to subsections (6) and (7), if 2 or more insurers are in the same order of priority to provide personal protection insurance benefits under subsection (5), an insurer that pays benefits due is entitled to partial recoupment from the other insurers in the same order of priority, and a reasonable amount of partial recoupment of the expense of processing the claim, in order to accomplish equitable distribution of the loss among all of the insurers. (9) As used in this section: (a) "Personal vehicle", "transportation network company digital network", and "transportation network company prearranged ride" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the limousine, taxicab, and transportation network company act, 2016 PA 345, MCL 257.2102. (b) "Transportation network company vehicle" means a personal vehicle while the driver is logged on to the transportation network company digital network or while the driver is engaged in a transportation network company prearranged ride. Sec. 3135. (1) A person remains subject to tort liability for noneconomic loss caused by his or her ownership, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle only if the injured person has suffered death, serious impairment of body function, or permanent serious disfigurement. (2) For a cause of action for damages under subsection (1) or (3)(d), all of the following apply: (a) The issues of whether the injured person has suffered serious impairment of body function or permanent serious disfigurement are questions of law for the court if the court finds either of the following: (i) There is no factual dispute concerning the nature and extent of the person's injuries. (ii) There is a factual dispute concerning the nature and extent of the person's injuries, but the dispute is not material to the determination whether the person has suffered a serious impairment of body function or permanent serious disfigurement. However, for a closed-head injury, a question of fact for the jury is created if a licensed allopathic or osteopathic physician who regularly diagnoses or treats closed-head injuries testifies under oath that there may be a serious neurological injury. (b) Damages must be assessed on the basis of comparative fault, except that damages must not be assessed in favor of a party who is more than 50% at fault. (c) Damages must not be assessed in favor of a party who was operating his or her own vehicle at the time the injury occurred and did not have in effect for that motor vehicle the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 at the time the injury occurred. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, tort liability arising from the ownership, maintenance, or use within this state of a motor vehicle with respect to which the security required by section 3101(1) 3101 was in effect is abolished except as to: (a) Intentionally caused harm to persons or property. Even though a person knows that harm to persons or property is substantially certain to be caused by his or her act or omission, the person does not cause or suffer that harm intentionally if he or she acts or refrains from acting for the purpose of averting injury to any person, including himself or herself, or for the purpose of averting damage to tangible property. (b) Damages for noneconomic loss as provided and limited in subsections (1) and (2). (c) Damages for allowable expenses, work loss, and survivor's loss as defined in sections 3107 to 3110, including all future allowable expenses and work loss, in excess of any applicable limit under section 3107c or the daily, monthly, and 3-year limitations contained in those sections, or without limit for allowable expenses if a selection to not maintain that coverage was made under section 3107c(1) for a policy issued or renewed after June 30, 2027 or, for a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, if an election to not maintain that coverage was made under section 3107d or if an exclusion under section 3109a(2) applies. The party liable for damages is entitled to an exemption reducing his or her liability by the amount of taxes that would have been payable on account of income the injured person would have received if he or she had not been injured. (d) Damages for economic loss by a nonresident. However, to recover under this subdivision, the nonresident must have suffered death, serious impairment of body function, or permanent serious disfigurement. (e) Damages up to $1,000.00 to a motor vehicle or, for motor vehicle accidents that occur after July 1, 2020, up to $3,000.00 to a motor vehicle, to the extent that the damages are not covered by insurance. An action for damages under this subdivision must be conducted as provided in subsection (4). (4) All of the following apply to an action for damages under subsection (3)(e): (a) Damages must be assessed on the basis of comparative fault, except that damages must not be assessed in favor of a party who is more than 50% at fault. (b) Liability is not a component of residual liability, as prescribed in section 3131, for which maintenance of security is required by this act. (c) The action must be commenced, whenever legally possible, in the small claims division of the district court or the municipal court. If the defendant or plaintiff removes the action to a higher court and does not prevail, the judge may assess costs. (d) A decision of the court is not res judicata in any proceeding to determine any other liability arising from the same circumstances that gave rise to the action. (e) Damages must not be assessed if the damaged motor vehicle was being operated at the time of the damage without the security required by section 3101(1).3101. (5) As used in this section, "serious impairment of body function" means an impairment that satisfies all of the following requirements: (a) It is objectively manifested, meaning it is observable or perceivable from actual symptoms or conditions by someone other than the injured person. (b) It is an impairment of an important body function, which is a body function of great value, significance, or consequence to the injured person. (c) It affects the injured person's general ability to lead his or her normal life, meaning it has had an influence on some of the person's capacity to live in his or her normal manner of living. Although temporal considerations may be relevant, there is no temporal requirement for how long an impairment must last. This examination is inherently fact and circumstance specific to each injured person, must be conducted on a case-by-case basis, and requires comparison of the injured person's life before and after the incident. Sec. 3172. (1) A person entitled to claim because of accidental bodily injury arising out of the ownership, operation, maintenance, or use of a motor vehicle as a motor vehicle in this state may claim personal protection insurance benefits through the assigned claims plan if any of the following apply: (a) No personal protection insurance is applicable to the injury. (b) No personal protection insurance applicable to the injury can be identified. (c) No personal protection insurance applicable to the injury can be ascertained because of a dispute between 2 or more automobile insurers concerning their obligation to provide coverage or the equitable distribution of the loss. (d) The only identifiable personal protection insurance applicable to the injury is, because of financial inability of 1 or more insurers to fulfill their obligations, inadequate to provide benefits up to the maximum prescribed. (2) Unpaid benefits due or coming due as described in subsection (1) may be collected under the assigned claims plan, and the insurer to which the claim is assigned is entitled to reimbursement from the defaulting insurers to the extent of their financial responsibility. (3) A person entitled to claim personal protection insurance benefits through the assigned claims plan under subsection (1) shall file a completed application on a claim form provided by the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility and provide reasonable proof of loss to the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility. The Michigan automobile insurance placement facility or an insurer assigned to administer a claim on behalf of the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility under the assigned claims plan shall specify in writing the materials that constitute a reasonable proof of loss within 60 days after receipt by the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility of an application that complies with this subsection. (4) The Michigan automobile insurance placement facility or an insurer assigned to administer a claim on behalf of the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility under the assigned claims plan is not required to pay interest in connection with a claim for any period of time during which the claim is reasonably in dispute. (5) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, personal protection insurance benefits, including benefits arising from accidents occurring before March 29, 1985, payable through the assigned claims plan must be reduced to the extent that benefits covering the same loss are available from other sources, regardless of the nature or number of benefit sources available and regardless of the nature or form of the benefits, to a person claiming personal protection insurance benefits through the assigned claims plan. This subsection only applies if the personal protection insurance benefits are payable through the assigned claims plan under subsection (1)(a), (b), or (d). As used in this subsection, "sources" and "benefit sources" do not include the program for medical assistance for the medically indigent under the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, or health insurance for the aged and disabled under subchapter XVIII of the social security act, 42 USC 1395 to 1395lll.1395mmm. (6) If the obligation to provide personal protection insurance benefits cannot be ascertained because of a dispute between 2 or more automobile insurers concerning their obligation to provide coverage or the equitable distribution of the loss, and if a method of voluntary payment of benefits cannot be agreed upon among or between the disputing insurers, all of the following apply: (a) The insurers who are parties to the dispute shall, or the claimant may, immediately notify the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility of their inability to determine their statutory obligations. (b) The Michigan automobile insurance placement facility shall assign the claim to an insurer and the insurer shall immediately provide personal protection insurance benefits to the claimant or claimants entitled to benefits. (c) The insurer assigned the claim by the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility shall immediately commence an action on behalf of the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility in circuit court to declare the rights and duties of any interested party. (d) The insurer to whom the claim is assigned shall join as parties defendant to the action commenced under subdivision (c) each insurer disputing either the obligation to provide personal protection insurance benefits or the equitable distribution of the loss among the insurers. (e) The circuit court shall declare the rights and duties of any interested party whether or not other relief is sought or could be granted. (f) After hearing the action, the circuit court shall determine the insurer or insurers, if any, obligated to provide the applicable personal protection insurance benefits and the equitable distribution, if any, among the insurers obligated, and shall order reimbursement to the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility from the insurer or insurers to the extent of the responsibility as determined by the court. The reimbursement ordered under this subdivision must include all benefits and costs paid or incurred by the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility and all benefits and costs paid or incurred by insurers determined not to be obligated to provide applicable personal protection insurance benefits, including incurred attorney fees and interest at the rate prescribed in section 3175 applicable on December 31 of the year preceding the determination of the circuit court. (7) The Michigan automobile insurance placement facility and the insurer to whom a claim is assigned by the Michigan automobile insurance placement facility are only required to provide personal protection insurance benefits under section 3107(1)(a) up to whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Unless subdivision (b) applies, the limit provided in section 3107c(1)(b). (b) If For a policy issued or renewed before July 1, 2027, if the person is entitled to claim benefits under the assigned claims plan under section 3107d(6)(c) or 3109a(2)(d)(ii), $2,000,000.00. Enacting section 1. Section 3107d of the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.3107d, is repealed effective July 1, 2028. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5889 (request no. H01583'25 g). (b) House Bill No. 5887 (request no. H03545'25). (c) House Bill No. 5888 (request no. H05612'25).